incubator/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.tr.dix.xml
    <!-- Nouns -->
    <pardef n="bira__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yı</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ya</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dan</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nın</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yla</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mı</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mda</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mdan</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mın</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mla</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nı</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nda</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ndan</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nın</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nla</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sı</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sını</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sına</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sında</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sından</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sının</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sıyla</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mız</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mızı</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mıza</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mızda</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mızdan</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mızın</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mızla</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nız</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nızı</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nıza</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nızda</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nızdan</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nızın</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nızla</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sı</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sını</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sına</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sında</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sından</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sının</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sıyla</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ları</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lara</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>larda</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lardan</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ların</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>larla</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>larım</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>larımı</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>larıma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>larımda</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>larımda</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>larımın</l>

      <e lm="acaba"><i>acaba</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ahzüita"><i>ahzüita</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="alacakarga"><i>alacakarga</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="alümina"><i>alümina</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="anlaşma"><i>anlaşma</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="aria"><i>aria</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="asma"><i>asma</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="aya"><i>aya</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="baderna"><i>baderna</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="balina"><i>balina</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="barda"><i>barda</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="bedava"><i>bedava</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="bîvefa"><i>bîvefa</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="boza"><i>boza</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="canfeza"><i>canfeza</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="cukka"><i>cukka</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="çamuka"><i>çamuka</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="çıta"><i>çıta</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="dalga"><i>dalga</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="delta"><i>delta</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="dokuma"><i>dokuma</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="dünya"><i>dünya</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="entelekya"><i>entelekya</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="façuna"><i>façuna</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="faska"><i>faska</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="fırka"><i>fırka</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="fodra"><i>fodra</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="futa"><i>futa</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="gına"><i>gına</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="harita"><i>harita</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="havza"><i>havza</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="hikmetihuda"><i>hikmetihuda</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="hurma"><i>hurma</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ıstampa"><i>ıstampa</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ihtiva"><i>ihtiva</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="intifa"><i>intifa</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="istafilina"><i>istafilina</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="işporta"><i>işporta</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="kadırga"><i>kadırga</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="kama"><i>kama</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="kaplumbağa"><i>kaplumbağa</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="karantina"><i>karantina</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="kasara"><i>kasara</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="kaygana"><i>kaygana</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="klâpa"><i>klâpa</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="korza"><i>korza</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="lâhzada"><i>lâhzada</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="liturya"><i>liturya</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="mahya"><i>mahya</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="maranta"><i>maranta</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="mekanizma"><i>mekanizma</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="moka"><i>moka</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="muşamba"><i>muşamba</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="nafıa"><i>nafıa</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="omurga"><i>omurga</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="pandomima"><i>pandomima</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="pavurya"><i>pavurya</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="politika"><i>politika</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="randa"><i>randa</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="safha"><i>safha</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="sarma"><i>sarma</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="sıpa"><i>sıpa</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="sperma"><i>sperma</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="şırınga"><i>şırınga</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="tapa"><i>tapa</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="tıpa"><i>tıpa</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="turba"><i>turba</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="vardiya"><i>vardiya</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="yarasa"><i>yarasa</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
      <e lm="zaparta"><i>zaparta</i><par n="bira__n"/></e>
